Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.073

Rape of a child in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of rape of a child in the first degree when the person has sexual intercourse with another who is less than twelve years old and the perpetrator is at least twenty-four months older than the victim.

(2) Rape of a child in the first degree is a class A felony.

[ 2021 c 142 s 2; 1988 c 145 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 142: See note following RCW 9A.44.050.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.